Alaska, session 34, HB42.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 14.11.011(b) is amended to read: 05 (b) For a municipality that is a school district or a regional educational 06 attendance area to be eligible for a grant under this chapter, the district shall submit 07 (1) a six-year capital improvement plan that includes a description of 08 the district's fixed asset inventory system and preventive maintenance program not 09 [NO] later than July [SEPTEMBER] 1 of the fiscal year before the fiscal year for 10 which the request is made; the six-year plan must contain for each proposed project a 11 detailed scope of work, a project budget, and documentation of conditions justifying 12 the project; 13 (2) evidence that the district has secured and will maintain adequate 14 property loss insurance for the replacement cost of all facilities for which state funds 01 are available under AS 14.11.005 or 14.11.007 or has a program of insurance 02 acceptable to the department; 03 (3) evidence acceptable to the department that the proposed project 04 should be a capital improvement project and not part of a preventive maintenance 05 program or regular custodial care program; and 06 (4) evidence acceptable to the department that the district 07 (A) has a preventive maintenance plan that 08 (i) includes a computerized maintenance management 09 program, cardex system, or other formal systematic means of tracking 10 the timing and costs associated with planned and completed 11 maintenance activities, including scheduled preventive maintenance; 12 (ii) addresses energy management for buildings owned 13 or operated by the district; 14 (iii) includes a regular custodial care program for 15 buildings owned or operated by the district; 16 (iv) includes preventive maintenance training for 17 facility managers and maintenance employees; 18 (v) includes renewal and replacement schedules for 19 electrical, mechanical, structural, and other components of facilities 20 owned or operated by the district; and 21 (B) is adequately adhering to the preventive maintenance plan. 22 * Sec. 2. AS 14.11.014(d) is amended to read: 23 (d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the committee may not 24 recommend for approval an application for bond debt reimbursement made by a 25 municipality 26 (1) for more than one school construction project listed on the 27 department's ranking of school construction project priorities under 28 AS 14.11.013(b); or 29 (2) for more than two major maintenance projects listed on the 30 department's ranking of major maintenance project priorities under 31 AS 14.11.013(b), except that the committee may recommend for approval an 01 application for bond debt reimbursement made by a municipality for all the 02 major maintenance projects of the municipality that are ranked within the top 20 03 projects on the department's list of major maintenance project priorities [OR 04 MAJOR MAINTENANCE FOR INDEBTEDNESS AUTHORIZED BY THE 05 QUALIFIED VOTERS OF THE MUNICIPALITY ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 06 2015, BUT BEFORE JULY 1, 2025]. 07 * Sec. 3. AS 14.11.100(s) is amended to read: 08 (s) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner may not 09 approve an application for bond debt reimbursement made by a municipality 10 (1) for more than one school construction project listed on the 11 department's ranking of school construction project priorities under 12 AS 14.11.013(b); or 13 (2) for more than two major maintenance projects listed on the 14 department's ranking of major maintenance project priorities under 15 AS 14.11.013(b), except that the commissioner may approve an application for 16 bond debt reimbursement made by a municipality for all the major maintenance 17 projects of the municipality that are ranked within the top 20 projects on the 18 department's list of major maintenance project priorities [OR MAJOR 19 MAINTENANCE FOR INDEBTEDNESS AUTHORIZED BY THE QUALIFIED 20 VOTERS OF THE MUNICIPALITY ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2015, BUT 21 BEFORE JULY 1, 2025]. 22 * Sec. 4. AS 14.11.102(c) is amended to read: 23 (c) The commissioner may not allocate funds to a municipality under 24 AS 14.11.100 for the retirement of the principal of and interest on outstanding tax- 25 exempt bonds, notes, or other indebtedness 26 (1) for more than one school construction project listed on the 27 department's ranking of school construction project priorities under 28 AS 14.11.013(b); or 29 (2) for more than two major maintenance projects listed on the 30 department's ranking of major maintenance project priorities under 31 AS 14.11.013(b), except that the commissioner may allocate funds to a 01 municipality for the retirement of the principal of and interest on outstanding 02 tax-exempt bonds, notes, or other indebtedness for all the major maintenance 03 projects of the municipality that are ranked within the top 20 projects on the 04 department's list of major maintenance project priorities [AUTHORIZED BY 05 THE QUALIFIED VOTERS OF THE MUNICIPALITY ON OR AFTER JANUARY 06 1, 2015, BUT BEFORE JULY 1, 2025]. 07 * Sec. 5. Section 6, ch. 3, SLA 2015, as amended by sec. 5, ch. 6, SLA 2020, is repealed. 08 * Sec. 6. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 09 read: 10 APPLICABILITY. AS 14.11.011(b), as amended by sec. 1 of this Act, 11 AS 14.11.014(d), as amended by sec. 2 of this Act, AS 14.11.100(s), as amended by sec. 3 of 12 this Act, and AS 14.11.102(c), as amended by sec. 4 of this Act, apply to an application for 13 bond debt reimbursement made by a municipality for school construction or major 14 maintenance for indebtedness authorized by the qualified voters of the municipality on or 15 after July 1, 2025. 16 * Sec. 7. This Act takes effect July 1, 2025. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.